Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-459
Injunction.

The department may maintain an action in the name of the state for an injunction against any person for establishing, operating, or maintaining a health care facility or health care service subject to the Health Care Facility Licensure Act without first obtaining a license as required by the act. In charging any defendant in a complaint in such action, it shall be sufficient to charge that such defendant did, upon a certain day and in a certain county, establish, operate, or maintain a health care facility or health care service without obtaining a license to do so, without alleging any further or more particular facts concerning the same.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 59.